Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-667.03
Sewer or water mains; failure to make connections; order; costs assessed.

If, after ten days' notice by certified mail or publication in a newspaper of general circulation, a property owner fails to make such connections and comply with such regulations as the council may order in accordance with section 16-667.02, the council may order such connection be made, and assess the cost thereof against the property so benefited.

Laws 1977, LB 483, § 3.